apertium-mar-eng.mar.dix
    <pardef n="डोळ/ा__n_m"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यात</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यातून</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यापुढे</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांत</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांतून</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांपुढे</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="राम__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>कडे</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पाशी</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>-->
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="काजल__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>कडे</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पाशी</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>-->
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->
  
    <pardef n="मोठ/ा__adj">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्या</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="लहान__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्या</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="छान__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs  -->

    <pardef n="खूप__preadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="तिथे__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="कुठे__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="चटकन__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="आहे/__vbser">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>त</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होता</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होते</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="डोळा"><i>डोळ</i><par n="डोळ/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="राम"><i>राम</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="राहुल"><i>राहुल</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="काजल"><i>काजल</i><par n="काजल__np"/></e>
    <e lm="मोठा"><i>मोठ</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छान"><i>छान</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जुना"><i>जुन</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गरम"><i>गरम</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थंड"><i>थंड</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लहान"><i>लहान</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फार"><i>फार</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आनंदी"><i>आनंदी</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खूप"><i>खूप</i><par n="खूप__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="कुठे"><i>कुठे</i><par n="कुठे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नाही"><i>नाही</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तिथे"><i>तिथे</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सध्या"><i>सध्या</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मग"><i>मग</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकत्र"><i>एकत्र</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="का"><i>का</i><par n="कुठे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चटकन"><i>चटकन</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हळूहळू"><i>हळूहळू</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="काळजीपूर्वक"><i>काळजीपूर्वक</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आहे"><i>आहे</i><par n="आहे/__vbser"/></e>
